Utah statutes.
10-9a-515.   Regulation of amateur radio antennas.
(1)  A municipality may not enact or enforce an ordinance that does not comply
with the ruling of the Federal Communications Commission in "Amateur Radio
Preemption, 101 FCC 2nd 952 (1985)" or a regulation related to amateur radio
service adopted under 47 C.F.R. Part 97.
(2)  If a municipality adopts an ordinance involving the placement, screening,
or height of an amateur radio antenna based on health, safety, or aesthetic
conditions, the ordinance shall:
(a)  reasonably accommodate amateur radio communications; and
(b)  represent the minimal practicable regulation to accomplish the
municipality's purpose.
